Maryland, session 2025, HB0179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
7–103.
(a) In this section, “value” means:
(1) the market value of the property or service at the time and place of the
crime; or
– 1 –

Ch. 192 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) if the market value cannot satisfactorily be ascertained, the cost of the
replacement of the property or service within a reasonable time after the crime.
(b) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 7–104.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE value
of property or service under this part shall be determined in accordance with this section.
(f) (1) When theft is committed in violation of this part under one scheme or
continuing course of conduct, whether from the same or several sources:
[(1)] (I) the conduct may be considered as one crime; and
[(2)] (II) the value of the property or services may be aggregated in
determining whether the theft is a felony or a misdemeanor.
(2) MULTIPLE THEFTS COMMITTED BY THE SAME PERSON IN
MULTIPLE COUNTIES UNDER ONE SCHEME OR CONTINUING COURSE OF CONDUCT
MAY BE JOINED AND PROSECUTED IN ANY COUNTY IN WHICH ANY ONE OF THE
THEFTS OCCURRED.
7–104.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ORGANIZED RETAIL THEFT” MEANS THE COMMISSION, EITHER
ALONE OR IN CONCERT WITH ONE OR MORE OTHER PERSONS, OF A SERIES OF
THEFTS OF RETAIL MERCHANDISE FROM ONE OR MORE RETAIL MERCHANTS OVER
A 90–DAY PERIOD WITH THE INTENT TO:
(I) PERMANENTLY DEPRIVE THE MERCHANT OF THE
MERCHANDISE;
(II) RETURN THE MERCHANDISE TO THE MERCHANT FOR
MONETARY OR OTHER GAIN; OR
(III) RESELL, TRADE, OR BARTER THE MERCHANDISE FOR
MONETARY OR OTHER GAIN.
(3) (I) “VALUE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–103 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(II) “VALUE” INCLUDES THE MARKET VALUE OF ANY PROPERTY
DAMAGED IN FURTHERANCE OF THE CRIME AND ANY COSTS TO REPAIR, REPLACE,
OR RESTOCK ANY DAMAGED OR STOLEN PROPERTY.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 192
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT COMMIT ORGANIZED RETAIL THEFT OF PROPERTY
WITH AN AGGREGATE VALUE EXCEEDING $1,500.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION WITH A
VALUE OF:
(1) AT LEAST $1,500 BUT LESS THAN $25,000 IS GUILTY OF A FELONY
AND:
(I) IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR
A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 OR BOTH; AND
(II) SHALL RESTORE THE PROPERTY TAKEN TO THE OWNER OR
PAY THE OWNER THE VALUE OF THE PROPERTY OR SERVICES;
(2) AT LEAST $25,000 BUT LESS THAN $100,000 IS GUILTY OF A
FELONY AND:
(I) IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10 YEARS
OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $15,000 OR BOTH; AND
(II) SHALL RESTORE THE PROPERTY TAKEN TO THE OWNER OR
PAY THE OWNER THE VALUE OF THE PROPERTY OR SERVICES; OR
(3) $100,000 OR MORE IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND:
(I) IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 20 YEARS
OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $25,000 OR BOTH; AND
(II) SHALL RESTORE THE PROPERTY TAKEN TO THE OWNER OR
PAY THE OWNER THE VALUE OF THE PROPERTY OR SERVICES.
(D) (1) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PRECLUDE PROSECUTION FOR THEFT
UNDER § 7–104 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) IF A PERSON IS CONVICTED UNDER § 7–104 OF THIS SUBTITLE
AND THIS SECTION FOR THE SAME ACTS OR TRANSACTIONS, THE CONVICTION
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL MERGE FOR SENTENCING PURPOSES INTO THE
CONVICTION UNDER § 7–104 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) (1) (I) IF A DEFENDANT IS CONVICTED OF OR RECEIVES A
PROBATION BEFORE JUDGMENT DISPOSITION FOR THEFT UNDER § 7–104 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, BURGLARY UNDER § 6–203 OR § 6–205 OF THIS ARTICLE, ROBBERY
– 3 –

Ch. 192 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
UNDER § 3–402 OR § 3–403 OF THIS ARTICLE, OR USE OF A FIREARM IN THE
COMMISSION OF A CRIME OF VIOLENCE OR A FELONY UNDER § 4–204 OF THIS
ARTICLE, ON REQUEST OF THE STATE’S ATTORNEY THE COURT SHALL MAKE A
FINDING OF FACT BASED ON EVIDENCE PRODUCED AT TRIAL AS TO WHETHER THE
CRIME IS ORGANIZED RETAIL THEFT.
(II) THE STATE HAS THE BURDEN OF PROVING BY A
PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE THAT THE CRIME IS ORGANIZED RETAIL
THEFT.
(2) IF THE COURT FINDS THAT THE CRIME IS ORGANIZED RETAIL
THEFT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THAT FINDING SHALL BECOME
PART OF THE COURT RECORD FOR PURPOSES OF REPORTING TO THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM CENTRAL REPOSITORY UNDER § 10–215 OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –